Wisconsin, session 2025, SB357.
do enact as follows:SB357,11Section 1. 1.101 of the statutes is created to read:SB357,2,321.101 Official state language; use of English in government 3operations.SB357,2,44(1) Definitions. In this section:SB357,2,85(a) “Local governmental unit” means a political subdivision, a special purpose 6district, an agency or corporation of a political subdivision or special purpose 7district, a school district, or a combination or subunit of any of the foregoing, in this 8state.SB357,2,99(b) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.SB357,2,1210(c) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 11commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, or other body in state 12government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law.SB357,2,1413(2) Establishing English as the official state language. The official 14language of this state is English.SB357,3,315(3) Alternatives to appointment of interpreters. If a state agency or 16local governmental unit is authorized or required by law to appoint an English 1language interpreter for a person, the state agency or local governmental unit may, 2in lieu of appointing an interpreter, provide the person with access to artificial 3intelligence or other machine-assisted translation tools.SB357,3,104(4) Use of English in governmental oral and written communication. 5(a) Unless otherwise specifically authorized or required by law and except as 6authorized in par. (b), all oral and written communication by all state agencies and 7local governmental units shall be in the English language, except that such 8communication may be in another language when appropriate to the circumstances 9of an individual case, the implementation of a program in a specific instance, or the 10discharge of a responsibility in a particular situation.SB357,3,1311(b) An officer or employee of a state agency or local governmental unit may use 12a language other than English in oral or written communication whenever 13necessary for any of the following purposes:SB357,3,14141. To protect the health, safety, or liberty of any citizen.SB357,3,15152. To teach or study another language.SB357,3,16163. To protect the rights of a criminal defendant or victim of a crime.SB357,3,17174. To promote trade, tourism, or commerce.SB357,3,18185. To facilitate activities relating to the compilation of any census.SB357,3,20196. To comply with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act 20under 20 USC 1400 et seq.SB357,3,22217. To use a proper name, term of art, or phrase from a language other than 22English.SB357,4,218. To comply with the constitution and laws of the United States or the 2constitution of this state.SB357,4,53(5) Use of languages. No state agency or local governmental unit may 4prohibit any person from becoming proficient in any language or restrict the oral or 5written use of any language for a nongovernmental purpose.SB357,26Section 2. 885.37 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB357,4,207885.37 (1) If a municipal court has notice that a person who is a juvenile or 8parent subject to ch. 938, or who is a witness in a proceeding under ch. 938, has a 9language difficulty because of the inability to speak or understand English, has a 10hearing impairment, is unable to speak, or has a speech defect, the court shall make 11a factual determination of whether the language difficulty or the hearing or 12speaking impairment is sufficient to prevent the individual person from 13communicating with his or her the person’s attorney, reasonably understanding the 14English testimony, or reasonably being understood in English. If the court 15determines that an interpreter is necessary, the court shall advise the person that 16he or she, except as provided in s. 1.101 (3), the person has a right to a qualified 17interpreter and that, if the person cannot afford one, an interpreter will be provided 18for him or her the person at the public’s expense. Any waiver of the right to an 19interpreter is effective only if made voluntarily in person, in open court, and on the 20record.SB357,321Section 3. 885.37 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB357,5,1122885.37 (3) (b) In any administrative contested case proceeding before a state, 23county, or municipal agency, if the agency conducting the proceeding has notice that 24a party to the proceeding has a language difficulty because of the inability to speak 1or understand English, has a hearing impairment, is unable to speak, or has a 2speech defect, the agency shall make a factual determination of whether the 3language difficulty or hearing or speaking impairment is sufficient to prevent the 4party from communicating with others, reasonably understanding the English 5testimony, or reasonably being understood in English. If the agency determines 6that an interpreter is necessary, the agency shall advise the party that he or she, 7except as provided in s. 1.101 (3), the party has a right to a qualified interpreter. 8After considering the party’s ability to pay and the other needs of the party, the 9agency may provide for an interpreter for the party at the public’s expense. Any 10waiver of the right to an interpreter is effective only if made at the administrative 11contested case proceeding.SB357,412Section 4. 885.38 (3) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB357,5,1713885.38 (3) (a) (intro.) If the a court determines that the a person has limited 14English proficiency and that an interpreter is necessary, the court shall advise the 15person that he or she, except as provided in s. 1.101 (3), the person has the right to 16a qualified interpreter at the public’s expense if the person is one any of the 17following:SB357,5,1818